Louisiana, session 2026, SB51.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:67.30 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§67.30. Fraudulent representation of military service or awards
A.(1) A person commits fraudulent representation of military service or
awards when he makes a false representation that he has received or otherwise
holds a military service record or award that was either revoked or not granted
to, achieved by, assigned to, or earned by the person with the intent to injure,
defraud, obtain economic gain, advantage, benefit, or secure any privilege for
himself or another.
(2) Whoever commits the crime of fraudulent representation of military
service or awards shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or
imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
B. Whoever commits the crime of fraudulent representation of military
service or awards with regard to any of the following military awards or honors
shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without
hard labor for not more than one year, or both:
(1) Congressional Medal of Honor as defined in 18 U.S.C. 704(c)(2).
(2) Distinguished-service cross awarded under 10 U.S.C. 7272.
(3) Navy cross awarded under 10 U.S.C. 8292.
(4) Air Force cross awarded under 10 U.S.C. 9272.
(5) Silver star awarded under 10 U.S.C. 7276, 8294, or 9276.
(6) Purple Heart awarded under 10 U.S.C. 1129.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 51 ENROLLED
(7) Combat Action Ribbon, Combat Action Badge, or Combat Action
Medal.
(8) A replacement of or duplicate of any of the awards listed in
Paragraphs (1) through (7) of this Subsection.
C. Whoever commits the crime of fraudulent representation of military
service or awards when the fraudulent representation results in the issuance of
a benefit reserved to active duty service members, veterans, or the family
members of active duty service members or veterans shall be fined not more
than ten thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more
than five years, or both. In addition, the offender shall be required to pay full
restitution of the benefit received in violation of this Subsection.
D. As used in this Section:
(1) "Award" means any medal, service ribbon, ribbon device, badge,
rank insignia, or other honor awarded by the armed services or reserve forces
of the United States or the national guard of any state.
(2) "Service record" means the actual record compiled and maintained
by the armed services or reserve forces of the United States or the national
guard of any state that documents the service rank, deeds, achievements,
qualifications, or actions performed by a person during his time in service.
(3) "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed services or
reserve forces of the United States or the national guard of any state.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.